Utah statutes.
76-6-1404.   Notice to sellers of identification requirements.

A dealer shall at all times maintain in a prominent place at the dealer's place of business, in open view to a seller of regulated metal, a clearly legible notice in not less than two-inch high lettering that contains the following language: "A PERSON ATTEMPTING TO SELL ANY REGULATED METAL MUST PROVIDE IDENTIFICATION AS REQUIRED BY STATE LAW".



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 187, 2013 General Session

